Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.065

Licenses—Issuance to persons licensed or registered before July 24, 1983.

Any person holding a valid license or certificate of registration to practice physical therapy issued by authority of this state prior to July 24, 1983, shall be issued a license under this chapter.

[ 1983 c 116 s 11.]